Maryland, session 2026, HB0512.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–101.
(a) In this title:
(1) the definitions in § 1–101 of this article apply without exception or
variation; and
(2) the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the Board of License Commissioners for Anne Arundel County.
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
– 1 –

Ch. 853 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
11–204.
(a) (1) The chair of the Board shall receive:
(I) an annual salary [of] THAT:
1. IS not [more] LESS than [$18,000] $21,240; and
2. INCLUDES ANY COST–OF–LIVING INCREASE
AVAILABLE TO NONREPRESENTED ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY NONREPRESENTED
EMPLOYEES; AND
(II) reimbursement for expenses reasonably incurred.
(2) Each other member of the Board shall receive:
(I) an annual salary [of] THAT:
1. IS not [more] LESS than [$15,000] $17,700; and
2. INCLUDES ANY COST–OF–LIVING INCREASE
AVAILABLE TO NONREPRESENTED ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY NONREPRESENTED
EMPLOYEES; AND
(II) reimbursement for expenses reasonably incurred.
11–206.
(a) (1) The Board may employ:
(i) one part–time deputy chief inspector at an annual salary [of]
THAT:
1. IS NOT LESS THAN $18,000; and
2. INCLUDES ANY COST–OF–LIVING INCREASE
AVAILABLE TO NONREPRESENTED ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY NONREPRESENTED
EMPLOYEES; AND
(ii) 18 part–time inspectors at an annual salary [of $7,000] THAT:
1. IS NOT LESS THAN $8,260 each; AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 853
2. INCLUDES ANY COST–OF–LIVING INCREASE
AVAILABLE TO NONREPRESENTED ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY NONREPRESENTED
EMPLOYEES.
(2) Each inspector shall receive a monthly expense allowance of $300,
subject to the approval of the Executive Director.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –